Hawaii, session 2025, SB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that repurposing existing commercial buildings into mixed-use developments provides a critical opportunity to address Hawaii's housing crisis while preserving its historical and cultural context. Historically, towns such as Hilo, Paia, and Honokaa thrived as mixed-use communities, where residential units above commercial establishments fostered vibrant neighborhoods and robust local economies.  Modern redevelopment of commercial spaces into mixed-use buildings offers numerous benefits, including the creation of affordable housing for service industry workers, which reduces financial strain on employees and relieves businesses from wage pressures tied to high housing costs.  By locating housing near workplaces, redevelopment supports worker retention, fosters community connections, and alleviates traffic congestion, thereby improving overall quality of life.  Additionally, reusing existing structures reduces environmental and financial costs associated with new construction while expediting the delivery of housing options, as many units are already built and ready for conversion.  This approach also ensures economic sustainability by maintaining commercial spaces that support local businesses and providing affordable residential units that are preserved in perpetuity for future generations. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a working group to identify existing mixed-use developments in the county of Maui that could be used as affordable housing and commercial rental leases. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation for administrative purposes a working group to identify existing mixed-use developments in the county of Maui that could be acquired by the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation for use as affordable housing and commercial rental leases. (b) The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)  The chairperson of the board of directors of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, or the Chairperson's designee, who shall serve as chairperson of the working group; (2)  The director of the department of housing of the county of Maui, or the director's designee; (3)  The president of the REALTORS Association of Maui, Inc., or the president's designee, who shall be invited to participate by the chairperson; (4)  One resident of the county of Maui, who shall have knowledge of commercial and residential financing, to be invited to participate by the president of the senate; (5)  One resident of the county of Maui, who shall have experience in redevelopment construction and permitting, to be invited to participate by the speaker of the house of representatives; (6)  One representative from a Maui housing nonprofit organization, who shall be invited to participate by the president of the senate; and (7)  One representative from a Maui housing nonprofit organization, who shall be invited to participate by the speaker of the house of representatives. (c) The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (d) The working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (e) The working group shall be dissolved upon adjournment sine die of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.